bg-BG: Фотоапарати и оптика > Фотоапарати > Цифрови фотоапарати: 360-градусови цифрови фотоапарати; Екшън камери; Компактни цифрови фотоапарати; Цифрови огледално-рефлексни (DSLR) фотоапарати; Средноформатни цифрови фотоапарати; Безогледални цифрови фотоапарати; Фотоапарати от типа "насочи и снимай"; Цифрови фотоапарати с далекомер
pt-BR: Câmeras e óptica > Câmeras > Câmeras digitais: Câmeras digitais de 360 graus; Câmeras digitais de ação; Câmeras digitais compactas; Câmeras digitais reflex de lente única (DSLR); Câmeras digitais de formato médio; Câmeras digitais sem espelho; Câmeras digitais automáticas; Câmeras digitais com telêmetro
hu: Fényképezőgépek és optikák > Fényképezőgépek > Digitális fényképezőgépek: 360 fokos digitális fényképezőgépek; Akció digitális fényképezőgépek; Kompakt digitális fényképezőgépek; Digitális egylencsés tükörreflexes (DSLR) fényképezőgépek; Közepes formátumú digitális fényképezőgépek; Tükör nélküli digitális fényképezőgépek; Mutass és rögzíts digitális fényképezőgépek; Távolságmérő digitális fényképezőgépek
pl: Aparaty, kamery i przyrządy optyczne > Aparaty i kamery > Aparaty cyfrowe: Aparaty cyfrowe 360 stopni; Aparaty cyfrowe sportowe; Kompaktowe aparaty cyfrowe; Cyfrowe lustrzanki jednoobiektywowe (DSLR); Aparaty cyfrowe średniego formatu; Bezlusterkowe aparaty cyfrowe; Aparaty cyfrowe Point-and-Shoot; Aparaty cyfrowe z dalmierzem
fi: Kamerat ja optiikka > Kamerat > Digitaalikamerat: 360 asteen digitaalikamerat; Toimintadigitaalikamerat; Digitaaliset kompaktikamerat; Digitaaliset yhden linssin heijastuskamerat (DSLR-kamerat); Keskiformaatin digitaalikamerat; Peilittömät digitaalikamerat; Helppokäyttöiset digitaalikamerat; Etäisyysmittarilliset digitaalikamerat
vi: Máy ảnh & Quang học > Máy ảnh > Máy ảnh kĩ thuật số: Máy ảnh kĩ thuật số 360 độ; Máy ảnh kĩ thuật số hành động; Máy ảnh kĩ thuật số nhỏ gọn; Máy ảnh kỹ thuật số phản xạ ống kính đơn (DSLR); Máy ảnh kỹ thuật số định dạng trung bình; Máy ảnh kĩ thuật số không gương lật; Máy ảnh kỹ thuật số ngắm và chụp; Máy ảnh kỹ thuật số định tầm
en: Cameras & Optics > Cameras > Digital Cameras: 360-Degree Digital Cameras; Action Digital Cameras; Compact Digital Cameras; Digital Single-Lens Reflex (DSLR) Cameras; Medium Format Digital Cameras; Mirrorless Digital Cameras; Point-and-Shoot Digital Cameras; Rangefinder Digital Cameras
ko: 카메라/광학 기기 > 카메라 > 디지털 카메라: 360도 디지털 카메라; 액션 디지털 카메라; 콤팩트 디지털 카메라; 디지털 싱글렌즈 리플렉스(DSLR) 카메라; 미디엄 포맷 디지털 카메라; 미러리스 디지털 카메라; 포인트 앤 슛 디지털 카메라; 거리 측정 디지털 카메라
fr: Appareils photo, caméras et instruments d’optique > Appareils photo et caméras > Appareils photo numériques: Appareils photo numériques à 360 degrés; Appareils photo numériques d’action; Appareils photo numériques compacts; Appareils photo reflex numériques (APRN); Appareils photo numériques format moyen; Appareils photo numériques sans miroir; Appareils photo numériques Point-and-Shoot; Appareils photo numériques télémétriques
ja: カメラ・光学機器 > カメラ > デジタルカメラ: 360度デジタルカメラ; アクションデジタルカメラ; コンパクトデジタルカメラ; デジタル一眼レフ（DSLR）カメラ; 中判デジタルカメラ; ミラーレスデジタルカメラ; オートフォーカスデジタルカメラ; レンジファインダーデジタルカメラ
sk-SK: Fotoaparáty a optické zariadenia > Fotoaparáty > Digitálne fotoaparáty: 360-stupňové digitálne fotoaparáty; Akčné digitálne fotoaparáty; Kompaktné digitálne fotoaparáty; Digitálne zrkadlovky (DSLR) s jedným objektívom; Digitálne fotoaparáty na stredný formát; Digitálne bezzrkadlovky; Kompaktné digitálne fotoaparáty; Digitálne fotoaparáty s diaľkomerom
tr: Kameralar ve Optik Malzemeler > Fotoğraf Makineleri > Dijital Fotoğraf Makineleri: 360 Derece Dijital Fotoğraf Makineleri; Aksiyon Dijital Fotoğraf Makineleri; Kompakt Dijital Fotoğraf Makineleri; Dijital Tek Lensli Refleks (DSLR) Fotoğraf Makineleri; Orta Format Dijital Fotoğraf Makineleri; Aynasız Dijital Fotoğraf Makineleri; Bas-Çek Dijital Fotoğraf Makineleri; Uzaklık Ölçerli Dijital Fotoğraf Makineleri
ro-RO: Aparate foto și componente optice > Aparate foto > Aparate foto digitale: Aparate foto digitale 360 de grade; Aparate foto digitale acțiune; Aparate foto digitale compacte; Aparate foto digitale reflex cu un singur obiectiv (DSLR); Aparate foto digitale cu format mediu; Aparate foto digitale fără oglinzi; Aparate foto digitale Point-and-Shot; Aparate foto digitale cu telemetru
zh-CN: 相机与光学器件 > 相机 > 数码相机: 360 度数码相机; 运动数码相机; 紧凑型数码相机; 数码单反 (DSLR) 相机; 中画幅数码相机; 无反光镜数码相机; 傻瓜数码相机; 测距数码相机
th: กล้องและออปติก > กล้อง > กล้องดิจิตอล: กล้องดิจิตอล 360 องศา; กล้องดิจิตอลแอคชั่น; กล้องคอมแพคดิจิตอล; กล้องดิจิตอลแบบสะท้อนเลนส์เดี่ยว (DSLR); กล้องดิจิตอลขนาดกลาง; กล้องดิจิตอลมิเรอร์เลส; กล้องดิจิตอลแบบเล็งแล้วถ่าย; กล้องวัดระยะแบบดิจิตอล
lt-LT: Fotoaparatai ir optika > Fotoaparatai > Skaitmeniniai fotoaparatai: 360 laipsnių skaitmeniniai fotoaparatai; Veiksmo skaitmeniniai fotoaparatai; Kompaktiški skaitmeniniai fotoaparatai; Skaitmeniniai veidrodiniai (DSLR) fotoaparatai; Vidutinio formato skaitmeniniai fotoaparatai; Beveidrodiniai skaitmeniniai fotoaparatai; Automatiniai skaitmeniniai fotoaparatai; Skaitmeniniai fotoaparatai su tolimačiu
it: Fotocamere/dispositivi ottici > Foto/videocamere > Fotocamere digitali: Fotocamere digitali a 360 gradi; Fotocamere digitali per azione; Fotocamere digitali compatte; Fotocamere reflex digitali a obiettivo singolo (DSLR); Fotocamere digitali di medio formato; Fotocamere digitali mirrorless; Fotocamere digitali inquadra e scatta; Fotocamere digitali a telemetro
es: Cámaras y ópticas > Cámaras > Cámaras digitales: Cámaras digitales de 360 grados; Cámaras digitales de acción; Cámaras digitales compactas; Cámaras digitales réflex de lente única (DSLR); Cámaras digitales de formato medio; Cámaras digitales sin espejo; Cámaras digitales de apuntar y disparar; Cámaras digitales con telémetro
nl: Camera's en optiek > Camera's > Digitale camera's: Digitale 360 gradencamera's; Digitale actiecamera's; Digitale compactcamera's; Digitale spiegelreflexcamera's (DSLR); Digitale camera's van middenformaat; Spiegelloze digitale camera's; Digitale point-and-shootcamera's; Digitale afstandsmetercamera's
hr-HR: Fotoaparati i optika > Fotoaparati > Digitalne fotoaparati: Digitalni fotoaparati od 360 stupnjeva; Akcijski digitalni fotoaparati; Kompaktni digitalni fotoaparati; Digitalni zrcalno-refleksni fotoaparati; Digitalni fotoaparati srednjeg formata; Digitalni fotoaparati bez ogledala; Digitalni fotoaparati point-and-shoot; Digitalni fotoaparati s daljinomjerima
pt-PT: Câmaras e ótica > Câmaras > Câmaras digitais: Câmaras digitais de 360 graus; Câmaras digitais de ação; Câmaras digitais compactas; Câmaras reflex de lente única digitais (DSLR); Câmaras digitais de médio formato; Câmaras digitais sem espelho; Câmaras digitais automáticas; Câmaras digitais com telémetro
nb: Kameraer og optikk > Kameraer > Digitale kameraer: 360-graders digitale kameraer; Action-digitalkameraer; Kompakte digitalkameraer; Digital Single-Lens Reflex (DSLR)-kameraer; Digitale kameraer i mellomformat; Speilløse digitalkameraer; Pek-og-skyt-digitalkameraer; Digitale kameraer med avstandsmåler
sl-SI: Fotoaparati in optika > Fotoaparati > Digitalni fotoaparati: 360-stopinjski digitalni fotoaparati; Akcijski digitalni fotoaparati; Kompaktni digitalni fotoaparati; Digitalni zrcalnorefleksni fotoaparati (DSLR); Digitalni fotoaparati srednjega formata; Brezzrcalni digitalni fotoaparati; Digitalni fotoaparati "usmeri in fotografiraj"; Digitalni fotoaparati z daljinomerom
zh-TW: 相機和光學元件 > 相機 > 數位相機: 360 度數位相機; 運動數位相機; 隨身數位相機; 數位單鏡反光 (DSLR) 相機; 中片幅數位相機; 無反光鏡數位相機; 傻瓜數位相機; 測距數位相機
de: Kameras & Optik > Kameras > Digitalkameras: 360-Grad-Digitalkameras; Action-Digitalkameras; Kompakte Digitalkameras; Digitale Spiegelreflexkameras (DSLR); Mittelformat-Digitalkameras; Spiegellose Digitalkameras; Point-and-Shoot-Digitalkameras; Digitalkameras mit Entfernungsmesser
da: Kameraer og optik > Kameraer > Digitalkameraer: 360-graders digitalkameraer; Actiondigitalkameraer; Kompakte digitalkameraer; DSLR-kameraer (Digital Single-Lens Reflex); Digitalkameraer i mellemformat; Spejlløse digitalkameraer; Peg-og-skyd digitalkameraer; Digitalkameraer med afstandsmåler
cs: Foto, video a optika > Fotoaparáty a kamery > Digitální fotoaparáty: 360° digitální fotoaparáty; Akční digitální fotoaparáty; Kompaktní digitální fotoaparáty; Digitální zrcadlovka (DSLR); Středoformátové digitální fotoaparáty; Digitální bezzrcadlovky; Plně automatické fotoaparáty; Dálkoměrné digitální fotoaparáty
ru: Камеры и оптика > Камеры > Цифровые камеры: Панорамные цифровые камеры; Цифровые экшн-камеры; Компактные цифровые камеры; Цифровые зеркальные камеры; Среднеформатные цифровые камеры; Беззеркальные цифровые камеры; Цифровые камеры с автофокусом; Дальномерные цифровые камеры
el: Κάμερες & οπτικά συστήματα > Κάμερες > Ψηφιακές κάμερες: Ψηφιακές κάμερες 360 μοιρών; Ψηφιακές κάμερες δράσης; Συμπαγείς ψηφιακές κάμερες; Ψηφιακές κάμερες μονοφακού αντανάκλασης (DSLR); Ψηφιακές κάμερες μεσαίου φορμά; Ψηφιακές κάμερες χωρίς καθρέφτη; Ψηφιακές κάμερες τύπου «Point-and-Shoot»; Ψηφιακές κάμερες Rangefinder
sv: Kameror och optik > Kameror > Digitalkameror: 360 graders digitalkameror; Actiondigitalkameror; Kompakta digitalkameror; Digitala enkellinsreflexkameror (DSLR); Mediumformatdigitalkameror; Spegellösa digitalkameror; Sikta-och-tryck av-digitalkameror; Avståndsmätardigitalkameror